Alaska statutes. Title 24. Legislature and Lobbying.
Article 4. Compensation of Employees.

Administrative Code. —

For leave rules, see 2 AAC 08.

Sec. 24.10.200.
House and senate employees.

During the legislative session, house and senate employees of the legislature are compensated under the salary schedule set out in AS

39.27.011

at the rate authorized by the Joint Rules Committee and upon approval of the house and senate. During the interim, house and senate employees are compensated at a rate approved by the president of the senate or the speaker of the house of representatives, as appropriate, consistent with the policies adopted by the Joint Rules Committee and approved by the house and senate.

[Repealed, § 11 ch 21 SLA 1987.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 13 SLA 1961; am § 1 ch 45 SLA 1965; am § 1 ch 22 SLA 1969; am §§ 3, 11 ch 21 SLA 1987)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 24.15.060(a) and (b). Renumbered in 1985.

Sec. 24.10.210.
Employees of legislative agencies.

Employees of agencies governed by permanent interim committees of the legislature under AS 24.20 and employees of the committees themselves are compensated under AS

39.27.011

, the general state salary schedule, at levels budgeted and approved by the governing committees in accordance with law.
The governing committees shall coordinate with each other on position levels and salary-related policies to every extent possible consistent with the statutory duties and powers of each permanent committee and its agency.

History.

(§ 1 ch 85 SLA 1978; am § 4 ch 21 SLA 1987)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 24.15.060(c).
Renumbered in 1985.

Sec. 24.10.220.
Bonuses for legislative employees prohibited.

An employee of the legislature may not be awarded or paid a bonus that is in addition to compensation authorized under AS

24.10.200

and

24.10.210

.

History.

(§ 11 ch 53 SLA 2005; am § 5 ch 34 SLA 2007)

Revisor’s notes. —

This section was enacted as § 11, ch. 53, SLA 2005, and codified in 2005.